Utah statutes.
77-28a-2.   Department of Corrections -- Authority to transfer inmates.

The Department of Corrections may transfer an inmate, as defined in Subparagraph (d) of Article II of the Interstate Corrections Compact, to any institution within or without this state if this state has entered into any contracts for the confinement of inmates in said institutions pursuant to Article III of that Compact.



Amended by Chapter 212, 1985 General Session

